Utah statutes.
58-83-102.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Online Prescribing, Dispensing, and Facilitation
Licensing Board created in Section 58-83-201.
(2)  "Branching questionnaire" means an adaptive and progressive assessment
tool approved by the board.
(3)  "Delivery of online pharmaceutical services" means the process in which a
prescribing practitioner diagnoses a patient and prescribes one or more of the
drugs authorized by Section 58-83-306, using:
(a)  a branching questionnaire or other assessment tool approved by the
division for the purpose of diagnosing and assessing a patient's health
status;
(b)  an Internet contract pharmacy to:
(i)  dispense the prescribed drug; or
(ii)  transfer the prescription to another pharmacy; and
(c)  an Internet facilitator to facilitate the practices described in
Subsections (3)(a) and (b).
(4)  "Division" means the Utah Division of Occupational and Professional
Licensing.
(5)  "Internet facilitator" means a licensed provider of a web-based system
for electronic communication between and among an online prescriber, the
online prescriber's patient, and the online contract pharmacy.
(6)  "Online contract pharmacy" means a pharmacy licensed and in good standing
under Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act, as either a Class A Retail Pharmacy
or a Class B Closed Door Pharmacy and licensed under this chapter to fulfill
prescriptions issued by an online prescriber through a specific Internet
facilitator.
(7)  "Online prescriber" means a person:
(a)  licensed under another chapter of this title;
(b)  whose license under another chapter of this title includes assessing,
diagnosing, and prescribing authority for humans; and
(c)  who has obtained a license under this chapter to engage in online
prescribing.
(8)  "Unlawful conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-83-501.
(9)  "Unprofessional conduct" is as defined in Sections 58-1-203 and
58-83-502, and as further defined by the division in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
